Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-15,301
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,301 to 81-15,311 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Environmental Response Act.

Laws 2022, LB1102, § 1.
July 21, 2022